New York, session 2025-2026, S7656.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 160-t of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 248 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. a. The basic continuing education requirement for recertification 5 or renewal of license shall be the completion by the applicant, during 6 the immediately preceding term of certification or license, of not less 7 than twenty-eight classroom hours of instruction in courses or seminars 8 which have received the approval of the department. Of such twenty-eight 9 required classroom hours, at least four hours of instruction shall 10 pertain to implicit bias awareness and understanding. For purposes of 11 this paragraph, "implicit bias" shall mean the attitudes or stereotypes 12 that affect an individual's understanding, actions and decisions in an 13 unconscious manner. 14 b. Computer based and distance learning courses may be approved by the 15 department so long as providers demonstrate the ability to monitor and 16 verify participation by the real estate appraiser for the specified time 17 periods. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03430-01-5